Rhode Island, session 2025, HB5273.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 21-28.9 of the General Laws entitled "The Good Samaritan Overdose
Prevention Act of 2016" is hereby amended by adding thereto the following section:
21-28.9-6. Training to administer opioid antagonists.
All lifeguards, and park and forest rangers, employed to work at any state or municipal
public beach or facility on a full-time basis shall be trained in the administration of opioid
antagonists, pursuant to the provisions of this chapter. All state or municipal public beaches and
facilities, that employ lifeguards, and park and forest rangers, shall maintain and provide a
minimum of four (4) doses of the opioid antagonist.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC000771/SUB A
========